Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 3 Registration of Vehicles
31-3-95.
Special plate for Woonsocket high school arts and athletics.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the Woonsocket education department. The plates shall be designed to reference Villa Novan Pride.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Villa Novan Pride motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by the Woonsocket education department in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

The Villa Novan Pride plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Villa Novan Pride plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Woonsocket education department, and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met, and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, pre-payment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Villa Novan Pride plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows:

Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Woonsocket high school arts and athletics program to assist in the fiscal needs required to maintain and promote arts and athletics at Woonsocket high school, and to continue in the fostering of Villa Novan Pride throughout the community. The distribution to the Woonsocket education department shall be placed in a restricted account and applied to the Woonsocket high school arts and athletic programs. The superintendent of schools shall supervise the distribution of said funds.

The Woonsocket education department will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of the Villa Novan Pride plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 440, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 471, § 1.

31-3-96.
Emergency medical technician plates.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered and authorized to make available to all licensed emergency medical technicians a special motor vehicle registration plate for any motor vehicle eligible for registration as an automobile or for a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) or less.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate. The administrator shall be authorized to retain newly issued plate numbers, at his or her discretion, for the purpose of conducting auctions of the right to use and display those numbers under such terms and conditions as the administrator may permit.

The emergency medical technician plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). Said plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Hope Valley Ambulance Squad, Inc., and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met, and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop application forms, pre-payment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue the plate upon the payment of a service charge of twenty dollars ($20.00) and a transfer charge of five dollars ($5.00) for the plate. All revenues shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 453, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 484, § 1.

31-3-97.
Special plate for home and hospice care of Rhode Island.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit entity Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island. The plates shall be designed to reference Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island.

The special plates shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by the Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, and with final approval from the Rhode Island state police.

The Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of passenger plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island, and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) has been met, and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fees, the Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows:

Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund, and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island in furtherance of their mission to provide compassionate and skilled care to those who are seriously ill in the state of Rhode Island.

The Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of the Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island, the organization must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in and for the benefit of the state of Rhode Island.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of the Home and Hospice Care of Rhode Island plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 468, § 1.

31-3-98.
Special plate for the Autism Project of Rhode Island.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the Autism Project of Rhode Island. The plates shall be designed to reference The Autism Project of Rhode Island.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Autism Project of Rhode Island motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by the Autism Project of Rhode Island in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

The Autism Project of Rhode Island plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Autism Project of Rhode Island plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Autism Project of Rhode Island, and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met, and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop, prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Autism Project of Rhode Island plates shall be subject to a forty dollars ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollars ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows:

Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Autism Project of Rhode Island in furtherance of their mission to develop a comprehensive system of care and resources that meet the needs of children and adults with autism and their families, including education, health, vocational, career, social and community needs in the state of Rhode Island.

The Autism Project of Rhode Island shall be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of the Autism Project of Rhode Island plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 461, § 1.

31-3-99.
Special plate for the wildlife rehabilitators association of Rhode Island (WRARI).

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island. The plates shall be designed to reference Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island.

The special plates shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued, and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by the Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles and with final approval from the Rhode Island state police.

The Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island, and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) has been met, and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fees, the Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows:

Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund, and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed to the Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island to help further their efforts in caring for injured and orphaned wildlife. All of the money raised shall be spent in Rhode Island.

The Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of the Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 480, § 1.

31-3-100.
General Magistrate Emeritus — John J. O’Brien.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of General Magistrate John J. O’Brien. This plate is to bear the identification “General Magistrate Emeritus” with an appropriate number and seal of the state thereon imprinted and the plate shall be issued subject to the same terms and conditions as contained in §

31-3-47(d)

for such period of time as General Magistrate O’Brien so desires. The provisions of §

31-3-17.1

shall apply with respect to the cost of issuance and registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 511, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 528, § 1.

31-3-101.
Special electric and hybrid electric vehicle registration plate designation.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to provide and issue a registration plate for motor vehicles powered in whole or in part by a storage battery. These plates may be made available to owners of vehicles recognized by the registry as electric-powered vehicles subject to the regular prescribed registration fee, and any transfer or remake fees, if applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 390, § 1.

31-3-102.
Special plate for the Boston Bruins Foundation.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the Boston Bruins Foundation. The plates shall be designed to reference The Boston Bruins Foundation.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Boston Bruins Foundation motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Boston Bruins Foundation, in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

The Boston Bruins Foundation plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Boston Bruins Foundation plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Boston Bruins Foundation and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Boston Bruins Foundation plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Boston Bruins Foundation in furtherance of its mission to assist charitable organizations in Rhode Island that demonstrate a strong commitment to enhancing the quality of life for children.

A ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Boston Bruins Foundation.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Boston Bruins Foundation license plate, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sources funds in, and for the benefit of, Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

The Boston Bruins Foundation will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Boston Bruins Foundation plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 350, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 386, § 1.

31-3-103.
Olympic medal winners.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the motor vehicles of all present and former Olympic medal winners. This plate is to bear the identification “Olympic Medal Winner” along with an appropriate designation number imprinted on it and shall be furnished without additional registration charge for so long as the Olympian desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 363, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 383, § 1.

31-3-104.
Special plate in honor of César E. Chávez.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates in honor of César E. Chávez. The plate shall be designed to reference the “César E. Chávez Committee of Rhode Island” and shall bear the seal of the state imprinted on it.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The César E. Chávez motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor-vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

The César E. Chávez motor vehicle plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The César E. Chávez motor vehicle plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the César E. Chávez Committee of Rhode Island, and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the César E. Chávez plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar issuance ($40.00) surcharge.

The forty-dollar issuance ($40.00) surcharge shall be allocated as follows: Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the César E. Chávez Scholarship Fund with the Rhode Island Foundation.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the César E. Chávez Scholarship Fund with the Rhode Island Foundation.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of César E. Chávez motor vehicle plates.

The César E. Chávez Committee of Rhode Island will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 463, § 1.

31-3-105.
Special plate for Rhode Island private colleges and universities.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for passenger vehicles based upon the various independent, nonprofit institutions of higher education (Brown University, Bryant University, Johnson & Wales University, New England Institute of Technology, Providence College, Rhode Island School of Design, Roger Williams University, and/or Salve Regina University).

The special plate(s) shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plates.

The respective independent higher-education institution’s motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

Each independent higher-education institution plate shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per institution per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The respective independent higher-education institution plate shall not be issued unless the minimum-order requirements are met by the requesting institution. The initial order will be handled by the president of the Association of Independent Colleges and Universities of Rhode Island (AICU RI), or his or her designee, and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order has been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division. The AICU RI president, or his or her designee, will act as program coordinator and point of contact for the division of motor vehicles. Subsequent independent higher-education institution plate orders will be handled by the division of motor vehicles.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, independent higher-education institution plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the respective independent higher-education institution as a nonprofit educational institution based in Rhode Island.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals will go to the respective independent higher-education institution.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of independent higher-education institution plates.

Any respective independent higher-education institution not pursuing or not reaching the minimum prepaid order of plates, as outlined in subsection (d), within thirty-six (36) months after this section is enacted, will not be eligible to obtain special motor vehicle registration plates as outlined above, absent further action of the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 355, § 1.

31-3-106.
Special plate for the Dorian J. Murray foundation.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the Dorian J. Murray Foundation. The plates shall be designed to reference the Dorian J. Murray Foundation.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plate.

The Dorian J. Murray Foundation motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Dorian J. Murray Foundation, in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

The Dorian J. Murray Foundation plates shall be subject to a minimum pre-paid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.) The Dorian J. Murray Foundation plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Dorian J. Murray Foundation and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Dorian J. Murray Foundation plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Dorian J. Murray Foundation in furtherance of its mission to assist charitable organizations in Rhode Island that demonstrate a strong commitment to enhancing the quality of life for children with pediatric cancer.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Dorian J. Murray Foundation.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Dorian J. Murray Foundation license plates, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sourced funds in, and for the benefit of, Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

The Dorian J. Murray Foundation will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Dorian J. Murray Foundation plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 505, § 1.

31-3-107.
Police chief emeritus — Ernest Spaziano.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the private passenger motor vehicle of the former police chief of the town of North Providence, Ernest Spaziano. This plate is to bear the identification of “Police Chief Emeritus,” along with an appropriate number and the plate shall be furnished without additional registration charge for such period of time as Ernest Spaziano so desires.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 510, § 1.

31-3-108.
Special plate for The Rocky Point Foundation, Inc.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for The Rocky Point Foundation, Inc. (hereafter referred to as “Rocky Point Foundation”). The plates shall be designed to reference Rocky Point Foundation.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plates.

The Rocky Point Foundation motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Rocky Point Foundation, in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

The Rocky Point Foundation plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Rocky Point Foundation plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Rocky Point Foundation and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Rocky Point Foundation plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: Twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Rocky Point Foundation in furtherance of its mission.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Rocky Point Foundation.

The Rocky Point Foundation shall be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Rocky Point Foundation plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 353, § 1.

31-3-109.
Special plate for Rhode Island public colleges and universities.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for passenger vehicles based upon the various public, nonprofit institutions of higher education (Community College of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, and/or the University of Rhode Island).

The special plate(s) shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plates.

The respective public higher-education institution’s motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

Each public higher-education institution plate shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per institution per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The respective public higher-education institution plate shall not be issued unless the minimum-order requirements are met by the requesting institution. The initial order will be handled by the Rhode Island commissioner of postsecondary education or his or her designee, and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order has been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division. The Rhode Island commissioner of postsecondary education, or his or her designee, will act as program coordinator and point of contact for the division of motor vehicles. Subsequent public higher-education institution plate orders will be handled by the division of motor vehicles.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, public higher-education institution plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the respective public higher-education institution as a nonprofit educational institution based in Rhode Island.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals will go to the respective public higher-education institution.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of public higher-education institution plates.

Any respective public higher-education institution not pursuing or not reaching the minimum prepaid order of plates, as outlined in subsection (d), within thirty-six (36) months after this section is enacted, will not be eligible to obtain special motor vehicle registration plates as outlined above, absent further action of the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 356, § 1.

31-3-110.
Special plate for the Lupus Foundation New England.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available special motor vehicle registration plates for the Lupus Foundation New England. The plates shall be designed to reference the Lupus Foundation New England.

The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of, and in the same manner as, the registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with §

31-3-9

. The registration certificate shall be in effect for the special plates.

The Lupus Foundation New England motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Lupus Foundation New England, in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

The Lupus Foundation New England plates shall be subject to a minimum prepaid order of at least nine hundred (900) sets of plates per plate type (i.e. passenger, commercial, etc.). The Lupus Foundation New England plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order(s) requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Lupus Foundation New England and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paperwork submitted to the division.

The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Lupus Foundation New England plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.

The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be distributed annually to the Lupus Foundation New England in furtherance of its mission to assist charitable organizations in Rhode Island.

A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated to the Lupus Foundation New England.

In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Lupus Foundation New England license plates, the foundation must use any Rhode Island sources funds in, and for the benefit of, Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.

Lupus Foundation New England will be required to submit an annual accounting report before such monies are distributed.

There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Lupus Foundation New England plates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 372, § 1.

31-3-111.
Gold Star Families.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is authorized and directed to issue a special registration plate for the motor vehicles of all eligible members of a Gold Star Family.

For the purpose of this section, “Gold Star Family” means a person eligible to receive a gold star lapel button as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 1126; provided, the death was determined to be in the line of duty.

The Gold Star Family motor vehicle plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates, and shall be designed by Gold Star Family members who are Rhode Island residents in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with design approval by the Rhode Island state police.

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 190, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 248, § 1].

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 190, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 248, § 1].

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 190, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 248, § 1].

The applicant shall not be required to pay a service charge or a transfer charge for each plate.

Only one set of “Gold Star Family” plates shall be issued to an eligible family member and only after satisfactory documentation of eligibility is presented.

The owner of a motor vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle and having a gross weight of twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.) or less who is issued Gold Star Family plates shall continue to pay the appropriate commercial registration fee for those plates. The owner of a motor vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of six thousand three hundred pounds (6,300 lbs.), but not more than twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.), shall sign an affidavit at the time of application for said plates stating that the vehicle is to be used for personal use only.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 9, § 3; P.L. 2017, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 248, § 1.